Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 9. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 04.11.560.
Appeals.

An action of an officer, employee, or agent of the board relating to the administration or enforcement of this title may be appealed to the board by the aggrieved party.

A decision by the board relating to the issuance, renewal, transfer, relocation, suspension, or revocation of a license under this title may be appealed to the superior court under AS

44.62.560

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.560.
Appeals.

An action of an officer, employee, or agent of the board relating to the administration or enforcement of this title may be appealed to the board by the aggrieved party.

A decision by the board relating to the issuance, renewal, transfer, relocation, suspension, or revocation of a license or an endorsement under this title may be appealed to the superior court under AS

44.62.560

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 78 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.570.
Refund and forfeiture of fees.

If an application for a license is denied, the board shall refund the license fee less the application fee.

A license fee may not be refunded after the license has been issued unless the board determines it has erred in the issuance through no fault of the applicant.

If a license is revoked on grounds that statements made in the application are untrue, the license fee paid by the applicant is forfeited to the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 178-181.

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 276-279.

Sec. 04.11.570.
Refund and forfeiture of fees.

If an application for a license or endorsement is denied, the board shall refund the license fee but not the application fee.

A license or endorsement fee may not be refunded after the license or endorsement has been issued unless the board determines it has erred in the issuance through no fault of the applicant.

If a license, endorsement, or permit is revoked on grounds that statements made in the application are untrue, the fee paid by the applicant is forfeited to the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 79 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.575.
Civil fine.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the board may, in addition to any other penalties imposed under this title, impose a civil fine upon a licensee that the board determines, at a proceeding under AS

04.11.510(c)

, has violated a provision of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted in accordance with AS

04.21.010

.

The board shall by regulation adopt a schedule of fines that a licensee may be required to pay under this section. A fine may not exceed the greater of

$50,000; or

an amount that is three times the monetary gain realized by the licensee as a result of the violation.

If the board is proceeding under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

, the board may not impose a civil fine exceeding the amount specified under AS

12.55.035

applicable to the offense for which the licensee was convicted, or with the licensee’s consent, the limit imposed under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For enforcement, see 13 AAC 104, art. 5.

Sec. 04.11.580.
Surrender or destruction of license.

A license issued under this title shall, if the board so directs, be surrendered on demand to a peace officer, agent, or officer of the board.

The licensee shall surrender a current license to the board within 10 days after the loss or vacation of the licensed premises.

If the license is destroyed, the licensee shall notify the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.580.
Surrender or destruction of license.

A license issued under this title shall, if the board so directs, be surrendered on demand to a peace officer, agent, or officer of the board.

The licensee shall surrender a current license to the board not later than 10 days after the loss or vacation of the licensed premises.

If the license is destroyed, the licensee shall notify the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 80 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.590.
Disposition of money.

Money collected from licenses and civil fines under this title shall be transferred by the board to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and deposited in the general fund.

A fee prescribed by the board in addition to fees authorized under this title shall be transferred to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and deposited in the general fund.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to carry out the purposes of AS 04.06.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 3 ch 75 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 110, § 4 (2003); am § 4 ch 55 SLA 2012)

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, § 171.

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, § 275.

Sec. 04.11.590.
Disposition of money.

Money collected from licenses, endorsements, permits, and civil fines under this title shall be transferred by the board to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and deposited in the general fund.

A fee prescribed by the board in addition to fees authorized under this title shall be transferred to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and deposited in the general fund.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to carry out the purposes of AS 04.06.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 3 ch 75 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 110, § 4 (2003); am § 4 ch 55 SLA 2012; am § 81 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.610.
Refund to municipalities.

Biennial license fees, excluding annual wholesale fees and biennial wholesale license fees, collected within a municipality shall be refunded semi-annually to the municipality.

If the officers of a municipality fail to actively enforce local ordinances, laws of the United States and the state, and the regulations relating to the manufacture and sale of alcoholic beverages in the state, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may deny the refund provided for under (a) of this section until the board finds the enforcement of the ordinances, laws, and regulations is resumed.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall recover any amounts erroneously refunded under (a) of this section. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall schedule repayments of erroneously refunded amounts over a sufficient period of time to minimize financial hardship to the municipality involved.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 63 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 110, §§ 5, 6 (2003); am §§ 5, 6 ch 55 SLA 2012)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Commissioner of Revenue has the authority under this section to deny refunds of liquor license fees to the City and Borough of Juneau if City and Borough of Juneau police officers fail to actively enforce local, state, and federal law. February 6, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The City and Borough of Juneau need not be excused, for purposes of this section, from failure to enforce laws in areas where it does not exercise police powers at all. February 6, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.610.
Allocation to municipalities.

An amount equal to the sum of the biennial license fees, excluding annual wholesale fees and biennial wholesale license fees, collected within a municipality shall be allocated semi-annually to the municipality.

If the officers of a municipality fail to actively enforce local ordinances, this title, laws of the United States and the state, and the regulations relating to the manufacture and sale of alcoholic beverages in the state, or fail to provide the director with a report of contacts with licensed establishments, educational activities concerning this title and local ordinances, and violations of this title occurring in the municipality, at the time and in the format as may be required by regulation adopted by the board, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may deny the allocation provided for under (a) of this section until the board finds the enforcement of the ordinances, laws, and regulations is resumed or the report is provided.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall recover any funds erroneously allocated under (a) of this section. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall schedule repayments of erroneously allocated funds over a sufficient period of time to minimize financial hardship to the municipality involved.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 63 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 110, §§ 5, 6 (2003); am §§ 5, 6 ch 55 SLA 2012; am §§ 82, 83 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.630.
Accessibility of license and licensed premises to inspection.

A licensee shall, upon request, make the licensed premises and places authorized for storage under AS

04.21.060

available for inspection by officers charged with the enforcement of this title, including members of the board and the director or an employee of the director, during all regular business hours.

A license issued under this title shall be posted within the licensed premises so as to be easily available for inspection upon request by a peace officer or other person during regular business hours.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For enforcement, see 13 AAC 104, art. 5.

Sec. 04.11.630.
Accessibility of license and licensed premises to inspection.

A licensee shall, upon request, make the licensed premises and places authorized for storage under AS

04.21.060

available for inspection by officers charged with the enforcement of this title, including members of the board and the director or an employee of the director, during all regular business hours.

A license, endorsement, or permit issued under this title shall be posted within the licensed premises or designated premises so as to be easily available for inspection upon request by a peace officer or other person during regular business hours or during the period specified on the permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 83 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.660.
License a privilege.

A license issued under this title is a personal privilege, not a property right.

The privilege conferred upon the licensee is personal in nature and affords protection to the licensee only.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.670.
Foreclosure.

A license issued under this title is not subject to foreclosure, and may not be used as collateral to secure a debt.
However, if a license is transferred to another person, the transferor may secure payment for real and personal property conveyed to the transferee upon the promise of the transferee to transfer the license back to the transferor upon default in payment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The federal Internal Revenue Service may assert a lien-like interest in the form of a hold on transfer of an Alaska liquor license for taxes, but it may not assert a traditional lien against a liquor license. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The IRS may not foreclose on a liquor license against which it has a tax lien or lien-like interest. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the IRS has purported to seize a liquor license, it may not operate the license or transfer it to another person without board approval. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.680.
Duration of licenses and permits.

Upon application and payment of one-half of the biennial fee, the board may issue a seasonal license under this title that is effective for the intervals stated on the license. A seasonal license may not be effective for more than 12 months in a two-year period. Otherwise, all licenses issued under this title other than a retail stock sale license are effective for the two calendar years ending December 31, unless a shorter period is prescribed by the board or by law.

A permit issued under this title shall be for the period prescribed by the board. The period shall be clearly designated on the permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 32 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see AS

04.11.540

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, § 193.

Sec. 04.11.680.
Duration of licenses, endorsements, and permits.

Upon application, the board may issue a seasonal license under this title that is effective for the intervals stated on the license. Otherwise, a license or endorsement issued under this title and a conditional contractor’s permit issued under AS

04.09.690

is effective for the two calendar years ending December 31, unless a shorter period is prescribed by the board or by law.

A permit issued under this title shall be for a specific time period. The period shall be clearly designated on the permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 32 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 84 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.690.
Discouragement of monopolies.

In a general sense, it is against the public interest that the issuance, renewal, or transfer of licenses issued under this title will create, or assist in the creation of, a monopoly.

The board may submit proposals to the governor and the legislature addressed to the discouragement of the creation of monopolies.

The board may not by regulation adopt a definition of a monopoly.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.700.
Renumbered as AS 04.21.055.